Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.001, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Entering posted land prohibited; signs. (a) Except as provided in subdivision 6, a person may not: (1) enter, for outdoor recreation purposes, any land that is posted under this subdivision without first obtaining permission of the owner, occupant, or lessee; or (2) knowingly enter, for outdoor recreation purposes, any land that is posted under this subdivision without first obtaining permission of the owner, occupant, or lessee. A person who violates this clause is subject to the penalty provided in section 97A.315, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). (b) The owner, occupant, or lessee of private land, or an authorized manager of public land may prohibit outdoor recreation on the land by posting signs once each year that: (1) state "no trespassing" or similar terms; (2) display letters at least two inches high; (3) either: (i) are signed by the owner, occupant, lessee, or authorized manager; or (ii) include the legible name and telephone number of the owner, occupant, lessee, or authorized manager; and (4) either: (i) are at intervals of 1,000 feet or less along the boundary of the area, or in a wooded area where boundary lines are not clear, at intervals of 500 feet or less; or (ii) mark the primary corners of each parcel of land and access roads and trails at the point of entrance to each parcel of land except that corners only accessible through agricultural land need not be posted. (c) A person may not deleted text begin erect a sign that prohibits outdoor recreation or trespassingdeleted text end new text begin act under paragraph (b) or (d)new text end where the person does not have a property right, title, or interest to use the land. new text begin (d) As an alternative to posting signage under paragraph (b), the owner, occupant, or lessee of private land, or an authorized manager of public land, may prohibit outdoor recreation on the land by: new text end new text begin (1) applying purple paint to trees along the perimeter of the area to which the person wants to prohibit entrance. Paint applied under this paragraph must be applied: new text end new text begin (i) at least three feet off the ground; new text end new text begin (ii) to trees that are at least one inch wide; and new text end new text begin (iii) in a strip that is at least eight inches tall; and new text end new text begin (2) posting signs once each year that mark the primary corners of the area to which the person wants to prohibit entrance. new text end